Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.533

Chronic conditions—Training and technical assistance for primary care providers.

(1) The department shall conduct a program of training and technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions for providers of primary care. The program shall emphasize evidence-based high quality preventive and chronic disease care and shall collaborate with the health care authority to promote the adoption of primary care health homes established under chapter 316, Laws of 2011. The department may designate one or more chronic conditions to be the subject of the program.

(2) The training and technical assistance program shall include the following elements:

(a) Clinical information systems and sharing and organization of patient data;

(b) Decision support to promote evidence-based care;

(c) Clinical delivery system design;

(d) Support for patients managing their own conditions; and

(e) Identification and use of community resources that are available in the community for patients and their families.

(3) In selecting primary care providers to participate in the program, the department shall consider the number and type of patients with chronic conditions the provider serves, and the provider's participation in the medicaid program, the basic health plan, and health plans offered through the public employees' benefits board.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "health home" and "primary care provider" have the same meaning as in RCW 74.09.010.

[ 2011 c 316 s 3; 2007 c 259 s 5.]

NOTES:

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.